Vermont, session 2025-2026, H124.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 25 is added to read:
§ 25. SUPERVISION AND REGULATION REPORT
(a) The Commissioner shall prepare an annual supervision and regulation
report applicable to persons, services, and products subject to the Department’s
jurisdiction. The purpose of the report is to inform the public and provide
VT LEG #380223 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.124
2025 Page 2 of 3
transparency about the Department’s supervisory and regulatory policies and
actions and current conditions relevant to the industries the Department
regulates. The report shall include:
(1) a general description of regulatory compliance within each industry,
including the number and nature of examinations, investigations, enforcement
actions, and consumer complaints;
(2) a general description of the financial and market conditions relevant
to each industry particularly as they relate to the availability and affordability
of products and services for consumers;
(3) an assessment of regulatory fees, including an itemization of the
revenue collected and the regulatory functions supported, and whether current
fees are comparable to those charged in other jurisdictions;
(4) a review of emerging trends and developments within each industry,
including a description of new products and services, and recommendations for
ensuring the regulatory environment is sufficiently responsive to those trends
and developments; and
(5) any other information the Commissioner deems relevant to the
purpose of the report as stated in this subsection.
(b) The Commissioner shall submit the report in writing to the General
Assembly on or before January 15, 2026, and annually thereafter,
notwithstanding 2 V.S.A. § 20(d).
VT LEG #380223 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.124
2025 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380223 v.1